glossing/lexicons/preverbs.lexc
@U.V.iv@пыԓвынтэнанвэнаӈаткок:@U.V.iv@пыԓвынтэнанвэнаӈатко INTER-V ;        ! iron scraper used to dress skins
@U.V.iv@ваӈгыргыръок:@U.V.iv@ваӈгыргыръо INTER-V ;        ! to arrive (of the period of bright nights)
@U.V.iv@ӄэԓтэтык:@U.V.iv@ӄэԓтэт INTER-V ;        ! to store
@U.V.tv@егиԓгук:@U.V.tv@егиԓгу INTER-V ;        ! to take off the tendons from a reindeer’ rear leg
@U.V.iv@тинэнмигчирэвӈык:@U.V.iv@тин%{Æ%}нмигчир%{Æ%}вӈ INTER-V ;        ! to make people work
@U.V.tv@понток:@U.V.tv@понто INTER-V ;        ! to eat s.o.’s liver
@U.V.iv@нанӄытвак:@U.V.iv@нанӄытва INTER-V ;        ! to be pregnant
@U.V.iv@пэврачеӈӈок:@U.V.iv@пэврачеӈӈо INTER-V ;        ! to emerge several times
@U.V.tv@тъиӈӈык:@U.V.tv@тъиӈӈ INTER-V ;        ! to sharpen
@U.V.iv@энанвэтгыравык:@U.V.iv@энанвэтгырав INTER-V ;        ! to set upright
@U.V.iv@иԓгыԓьувык:@U.V.iv@иԓгыԓьув INTER-V ;        ! to grow pale
@U.V.tv@пэгчиӈык:@U.V.tv@п%{Æ%}гчиӈ INTER-V ;        ! to be surprised
@U.V.tv@рыръаԓӈытовык:@U.V.tv@рыръаԓӈытов INTER-V ;        ! to solve
@U.V.tv@рыгынкэвык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}гынкэв INTER-V ;        ! to fatten
@U.V.tv@тэӈыԓьыԓтэтык:@U.V.tv@тэӈыԓьыԓтэт INTER-V ;        ! to lose
@U.V.iv@ойвынтак:@U.V.iv@ойвынта INTER-V ;        ! to run to the camp, to the village
@U.V.tv@гырык:@U.V.tv@г%{ы%}р INTER-V ;        ! to catch with a lasso
@U.V.tv@пуйъэтвык:@U.V.tv@пуйъ%{Æ%}тв INTER-V ;        ! to remove soot
@U.V.tv@пурыԓӄынтык:@U.V.tv@пурыԓӄынт INTER-V ;        ! to burst
@U.V.iv@туттывик:@U.V.iv@туттыви INTER-V ;        ! to renew, to repair
@U.V.iv@ԓигук:@U.V.iv@ԓигу INTER-V ;        ! to eat eggs
@U.V.iv@ӈырараԓечетык:@U.V.iv@ӈырараԓечет INTER-V ;        ! to slide on one’s knees
@U.V.iv@чьэтԓыӄатык:@U.V.iv@чьэтԓыӄат INTER-V ;        ! to curve on the side
@U.V.iv@кытӄаяватык:@U.V.iv@кытӄаяват INTER-V ;        ! to be completely covered with frost
@U.V.iv@чимгъунӈэк:@U.V.iv@чимгъунӈ%{Æ%} INTER-V ;        ! to come to one’s senses
@U.V.tv@римпывэтык:@U.V.tv@%{R%}импыв%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to make s.o
@U.V.iv@эпырӄагтатык:@U.V.iv@эпырӄагтат INTER-V ;        ! to spray
@U.V.iv@эмутвык:@U.V.iv@%{Æ%}мутв INTER-V ;        ! to grate roots
@U.V.iv@эӈэӈытвик:@U.V.iv@эӈ%{Æ%}ӈытви INTER-V ;        ! to become a shaman
@U.V.iv@тавтычгыӈык:@U.V.iv@тавтычгыӈ INTER-V ;        ! to sew a woman summer overall
@U.V.iv@кычьымэтык:@U.V.iv@кычьымэт INTER-V ;        ! to face each other
@U.V.tv@пынчик:@U.V.tv@пынчи INTER-V ;        ! to turn inside out
@U.V.iv@мимԓетык:@U.V.iv@мимԓет INTER-V ;        ! to be covered with water
@U.V.tv@мыԓытйик:@U.V.tv@м%{ы%}ԓытйи INTER-V ;        ! to wound s.o
@U.V.iv@мэԓитык:@U.V.iv@м%{Æ%}ԓит INTER-V ;        ! to seem
@U.V.tv@упынчийвивык:@U.V.tv@упынчийвив INTER-V ;        ! to scatter
@U.V.tv@ръарқовыткок:@U.V.tv@ръарқовытко INTER-V ;        ! to rub the reindeer fur
@U.V.iv@эвмытвик:@U.V.iv@%{Æ%}вмытви INTER-V ;        ! to become attached to
@U.V.iv@иԓетык:@U.V.iv@иԓет INTER-V ;        ! to rain
@U.V.iv@кытвэнвыԓӄатык:@U.V.iv@кытвэнвыԓӄат INTER-V ;        ! to come out on a path
@U.V.tv@рыпгыԓӄэвык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}пгыԓӄэв INTER-V ;        ! to float (timber)
@U.V.iv@ӈэԓвыԓьынӈэк:@U.V.iv@ӈэԓвыԓьынӈэ INTER-V ;        ! to inherit a herd
@U.V.iv@пэԓяткок:@U.V.iv@пэԓятко INTER-V ;        ! to abandon
@U.V.iv@о'равытвак:@U.V.iv@о'равытва INTER-V ;        ! to look from within
@U.V.iv@кимычьэтык:@U.V.iv@кимычь%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to be delayed
@U.V.iv@раԓечетык:@U.V.iv@раԓечет INTER-V ;        ! to slide
@U.V.tv@чывиткук:@U.V.tv@ч%{ы%}витку INTER-V ;        ! to cut into pieces
@U.V.tv@и'ԓгэтык:@U.V.tv@и'ԓг%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to harness
@U.V.tv@инэнӄитэвык:@U.V.tv@ин%{Æ%}нӄит%{Æ%}в INTER-V ;        ! to freeze meat
@U.V.iv@ӄэнрэткук:@U.V.iv@ӄэнр%{Æ%}тку INTER-V ;        ! to toboggan
@U.V.iv@ӄэвигичик:@U.V.iv@ӄ%{Æ%}вигичи INTER-V ;        ! to go and ask for food
@U.V.tv@выроттатык:@U.V.tv@в%{ы%}роттат INTER-V ;        ! to spread branches
@U.V.tv@пынԓёсӄэвык:@U.V.tv@пынԓёсӄэв INTER-V ;        ! to inquire
@U.V.tv@рыкэмԓиԓԓьэвык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}к%{Æ%}мԓиԓԓь%{Æ%}в INTER-V ;        ! to tie, to fasten
@U.V.tv@кычьымгитэк:@U.V.tv@кычьымгит%{Æ%} INTER-V ;        ! to look with pleasure at
@U.V.iv@муутыԓек:@U.V.iv@муутыԓе INTER-V ;        ! to start (of a caravan)
@U.V.iv@аӈӄагыннэкок:@U.V.iv@аӈӄагыннэко INTER-V ;        ! to catch sea mammals
@U.V.tv@рыкымъукэвык:@U.V.tv@рыкымъук%{Æ%}в INTER-V ;        ! to bend
@U.V.tv@йыръытвык:@U.V.tv@йыръытв INTER-V ;        ! ch
@U.V.iv@ӈаргынтэԓык:@U.V.iv@ӈаргынтэԓ INTER-V ;        ! to wander
@U.V.iv@тымгытвак:@U.V.iv@тымгытва INTER-V ;        ! to be calm (of the weather)
@U.V.iv@э’ӄэткук:@U.V.iv@э’ӄ%{Æ%}тку INTER-V ;        ! to die during an epidemic
@U.V.iv@ԓьутԓепыԓьэтык:@U.V.iv@ԓьутԓепыԓь%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to look constantly аround
@U.V.tv@рэԓкык:@U.V.tv@%{R%}эԓк INTER-V ;        ! to immerse
@U.V.iv@мигчирыткук:@U.V.iv@мигчирытку INTER-V ;        ! to work
@U.V.iv@вуԓвыниԓюк:@U.V.iv@вуԓвыниԓю INTER-V ;        ! to swing, to sway
@U.V.iv@раӄытвак:@U.V.iv@раӄытва INTER-V ;        ! ch
@U.V.iv@ӄирымнэвык:@U.V.iv@ӄирымн%{Æ%}в INTER-V ;        ! to become callous
@U.V.iv@рытрыкымгытык:@U.V.iv@рытрыкымгыт INTER-V ;        ! to contract (of muscles)
@U.V.tv@имтик:@U.V.tv@имти INTER-V ;        ! to bear on one’s back
@U.V.iv@пыԓвынтыԓвэнаӈаткок:@U.V.iv@пыԓвынтыԓвэнаӈатко INTER-V ;        ! to work with a hacksaw
@U.V.iv@утъымэтык:@U.V.iv@утъым%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to set up a yaranga
@U.V.tv@рычимгъувык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}чимгъув INTER-V ;        ! to propose
@U.V.tv@рытэйӈэтык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}тэйӈэт INTER-V ;        ! to provide for s.o.’s needs
@U.V.tv@тэйкык:@U.V.tv@тэйк INTER-V ;        ! to produce
@U.V.iv@ԓеԓеԓевиик:@U.V.iv@ԓеԓеԓевии INTER-V ;        ! to graze in the dew
@U.V.iv@энамайынԓяк:@U.V.iv@энамайынԓя INTER-V ;        ! to take a deceased person to the tundra
@U.V.iv@ӄэвйиԓюк:@U.V.iv@ӄ%{Æ%}вйиԓю INTER-V ;        ! to swing
@U.V.iv@моԓԓытъыӈӈок:@U.V.iv@моԓԓытъыӈӈо INTER-V ;        ! to begin to bleed
@U.V.tv@йыкыргыкыԓтык:@U.V.tv@й%{ы%}кыргыкыԓт INTER-V ;        ! to gag
@U.V.tv@ръатчавык:@U.V.tv@%{R%}ъатчав INTER-V ;        ! to keep s.o
@U.V.tv@ымыпчакык:@U.V.tv@ымыпчак INTER-V ;        ! to immerse s.o
@U.V.iv@рарэрык:@U.V.iv@рарэр INTER-V ;        ! to find a yaranga
@U.V.iv@чеԓгыръок:@U.V.iv@чеԓгыръо INTER-V ;        ! to redden
@U.V.tv@римэтык:@U.V.tv@%{R%}им%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to shave
@U.V.iv@а’мйытчак:@U.V.iv@а’мйытча INTER-V ;        ! to stretch oneself
@U.V.tv@рыматаӈатык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}матаӈат INTER-V ;        ! to give a girl in marriage
@U.V.tv@рыраԓкотвак:@U.V.tv@рыраԓкотва INTER-V ;        ! to keep (to leave) in the inner tent
@U.V.tv@руйӈыԓьыԓтэвык:@U.V.tv@руйӈыԓьыԓт%{Æ%}в INTER-V ;        ! to win a competition, to defeat
@U.V.tv@йытыткук:@U.V.tv@й%{ы%}тытку INTER-V ;        ! to take off
@U.V.iv@пыгыԓӄытвак:@U.V.iv@пыгыԓӄытва INTER-V ;        ! to float
@U.V.iv@оонъыгыркэк:@U.V.iv@оонъыгыркэ INTER-V ;        ! to gather berries
@U.V.tv@рыкватык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}кват INTER-V ;        ! to grip
@U.V.iv@араттак:@U.V.iv@аратта INTER-V ;        ! to look for walruses, etc
@U.V.tv@тэнъегтэчӈык:@U.V.tv@тэнъегтэчӈ INTER-V ;        ! to maintain s.o
@U.V.iv@чемгъотымӈэвык:@U.V.iv@чемгъотымӈэв INTER-V ;        ! to rage
@U.V.iv@ӈытэтык:@U.V.iv@ӈ%{ы%}тэт INTER-V ;        ! to be carried away by the ice
@U.V.iv@кытгынтыԓьатык:@U.V.iv@кытгынтыԓьат INTER-V ;        ! to run a long time
@U.V.iv@аройвытвак:@U.V.iv@аройвытва INTER-V ;        ! to be well
@U.V.iv@ӄаарэрык:@U.V.iv@ӄаарэр INTER-V ;        ! то seek one’s reindeer
@U.V.iv@о’мрэнатвак:@U.V.iv@о’мрэнатва INTER-V ;        ! to take an oath
@U.V.iv@тыӈэпԓыткук:@U.V.iv@тыӈ%{Æ%}пԓытку INTER-V ;        ! to ripen
@U.V.iv@кокапойгатык:@U.V.iv@кокапойгат INTER-V ;        ! to place a tripod above the fire
@U.V.tv@рытъыԓевык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}тъыԓев INTER-V ;        ! to hurt
@U.V.tv@кытаймэтык:@U.V.tv@к%{ы%}таймэт INTER-V ;        ! to press
@U.V.iv@гаԓясӄычатык:@U.V.iv@гаԓясӄычат INTER-V ;        ! to flash past
@U.V.iv@чарэмаратык:@U.V.iv@чарэмарат INTER-V ;        ! ch
@U.V.iv@тэпӄэнйик:@U.V.iv@тэпӄ%{Æ%}нйи INTER-V ;        ! to reach a spit
@U.V.tv@пычгыргатык:@U.V.tv@пычгыргат INTER-V ;        ! to sew a fur edge
@U.V.iv@каӈэӄыкватык:@U.V.iv@каӈэӄыкват INTER-V ;        ! to stuff oneself
@U.V.iv@пэгтымԓек:@U.V.iv@пэгтымԓе INTER-V ;        ! to break a sledge runner
@U.V.iv@мгок:@U.V.iv@мго INTER-V ;        ! to begin
@U.V.tv@рытымӈэтвавык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}тымӈэтвав INTER-V ;        ! to leave s.o
@U.V.iv@о’мрыкватык:@U.V.iv@о’мрыкват INTER-V ;        ! to maintain the yaranga firmly on the ground with stones
@U.V.iv@инэчвик:@U.V.iv@ин%{Æ%}чви INTER-V ;        ! to divide
@U.V.iv@рармавъяаӈык:@U.V.iv@рармавъяаӈ INTER-V ;        ! to want to become strong
@U.V.iv@кэвыԓӄэтык:@U.V.iv@кэвыԓӄэт INTER-V ;        ! to get out on an even ground
@U.V.iv@мэмԓыпгатык:@U.V.iv@мэмԓыпгат INTER-V ;        ! to be covered with puddles
@U.V.tv@танвакъоӈык:@U.V.tv@танвакъоӈ INTER-V ;        ! to ask s.o
@U.V.tv@ванныпык:@U.V.tv@ваннып INTER-V ;        ! to catch, to hook
@U.V.tv@тывэк:@U.V.tv@т%{ы%}вэ INTER-V ;        ! to call
@U.V.iv@энанвыԓгавык:@U.V.iv@энанвыԓгав INTER-V ;        ! to make thin
@U.V.iv@энанԓыватык:@U.V.iv@энанԓыват INTER-V ;        ! to feed at the breast
@U.V.tv@пычынԓик:@U.V.tv@пычынԓи INTER-V ;        ! to roll up
@U.V.tv@тэԓымгыӈык:@U.V.tv@тэԓымгыӈ INTER-V ;        ! to sew a hood
@U.V.iv@имԓыԓӄэтык:@U.V.iv@имԓыԓӄ%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to go into the water
@U.V.iv@тэвэнаӈантак:@U.V.iv@тэвэнаӈанта INTER-V ;        ! to go and fetch an oar
@U.V.iv@кытыԓӄатык:@U.V.iv@кытыԓӄат INTER-V ;        ! to come out to a place with hardened snow
@U.V.iv@мычетык:@U.V.iv@м%{ы%}чет INTER-V ;        ! остерегаться
@U.V.tv@рычикук:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}чику INTER-V ;        ! to analyse
@U.V.tv@рытэвык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}тэв INTER-V ;        ! to say loudly, to shout, to repeat
@U.V.iv@вагыԓытвак:@U.V.iv@вагыԓытва INTER-V ;        ! to be across one’s shoulder
@U.V.iv@пъуԓтынтэтык:@U.V.iv@пъуԓтынт%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to become crooked
@U.V.tv@рыгитэвык:@U.V.tv@рыгит%{Æ%}в INTER-V ;        ! to show
@U.V.iv@кагытрытвак:@U.V.iv@кагытрытва INTER-V ;        ! to be unconscious
@U.V.iv@мыргогэчек:@U.V.iv@мыргогэче INTER-V ;        ! to gather seaweeds
@U.V.iv@рэчьэнӈык:@U.V.iv@рэчьэнӈ INTER-V ;        ! to want to grow fat
@U.V.iv@гиԓгитэткук:@U.V.iv@гиԓгит%{Æ%}тку INTER-V ;        ! to observe the ice floe
@U.V.iv@тъымничук:@U.V.iv@тъымничу INTER-V ;        ! to dance lightly
@U.V.tv@рыкэтгуԓтэвык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}к%{Æ%}тгуԓт%{Æ%}в INTER-V ;        ! to gain the upper hand
@U.V.tv@рыӄэргавык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}ӄэргав INTER-V ;        ! illuminate
@U.V.iv@гываткок:@U.V.iv@г%{ы%}ватко INTER-V ;        ! to clutch
@U.V.iv@тинэнвуԓӄытвиӈык:@U.V.iv@тин%{Æ%}нвуԓӄытвиӈ INTER-V ;        ! to fall (of the night)
@U.V.tv@тыԓеԓьэтык:@U.V.tv@т%{ы%}ԓеԓьэт INTER-V ;        ! to cross
@U.V.iv@чемысӄавык:@U.V.iv@чемысӄав INTER-V ;        ! to become shallow
@U.V.tv@рыгынкэвэтык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}гынкэвэт INTER-V ;        ! to make s.o
@U.V.iv@ӄэтытвак:@U.V.iv@ӄэтытва INTER-V ;        ! to freeze
@U.V.iv@панръачаткок:@U.V.iv@панръачатко INTER-V ;        ! urinate
@U.V.tv@парэк:@U.V.tv@парэ INTER-V ;        ! to shear
@U.V.iv@пэԓӄынтытыԓек:@U.V.iv@пэԓӄынтытыԓе INTER-V ;        ! to turn back
@U.V.iv@кэймитык:@U.V.iv@к%{Æ%}ймит INTER-V ;        ! to deliver (a mother in childbirth)
@U.V.iv@каԓготкэԓьатык:@U.V.iv@каԓготкэԓьат INTER-V ;        ! to brag
@U.V.tv@ръувэвык:@U.V.tv@%{R%}ъув%{Æ%}в INTER-V ;        ! to narrow
@U.V.tv@вэтгавтааӈык:@U.V.tv@вэтгавтааӈ INTER-V ;        ! to tease
@U.V.iv@татԓыӈык:@U.V.iv@татԓыӈ INTER-V ;        ! to assent
@U.V.tv@очык%.v:@U.V.tv@оч INTER-V ;        ! to answer
